Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1133XS (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 11 Section 1. Section 307A.1A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. There is created a state transportation commission 3 which shall consist of seven members, not more than four of 4 whom shall be from the same political party. The governor 5 shall appoint the members of the state transportation 6 commission for a term of four years beginning at 12:01 a.m. 7 on July 1 in the year of appointment and expiring at 12:00 8 midnight on June 30 in the year of expiration, subject to 9 confirmation by the senate. For each of the seven regions of 10 the state, as designated by paragraph âbâ , the governor shall 11 appoint one member to represent the region, and the member 12 shall reside in the region. 13 b. For purposes of this subsection, the state is divided 14 into seven regions, which shall be composed of the following 15 counties: 16 (1) Region 1 consists of Buena Vista, Calhoun, Cherokee, 17 Clay, Dickinson, Emmet, Franklin, Hamilton, Hardin, Humboldt, 18 Ida, Kossuth, Lyon, OâBrien, Osceola, Palo Alto, Plymouth, 19 Pocahontas, Sac, Sioux, Webster, Woodbury, and Wright counties. 20 (2) Region 2 consists of Black Hawk, Bremer, Buchanan, 21 Butler, Cerro Gordo, Chickasaw, Fayette, Floyd, Grundy, 22 Hancock, Howard, Mitchell, Winnebago, Winneshiek, and Worth 23 counties. 24 (3) Region 3 consists of Allamakee, Clayton, Clinton, 25 Delaware, Dubuque, Jackson, and Scott counties. 26 (4) Region 4 consists of Adair, Audubon, Carroll, Cass, 27 Crawford, Fremont, Greene, Guthrie, Harrison, Mills, Monona, 28 Pottawattamie, and Shelby counties. 29 (5) Region 5 consists of Boone, Dallas, Jasper, Madison, 30 Mahaska, Marion, Marshall, Polk, Poweshiek, Story, Tama, and 31 Warren counties. 32 (6) Region 6 consists of Benton, Cedar, Des Moines, 33 Henry, Iowa, Johnson, Jones, Lee, Linn, Louisa, and Muscatine 34 counties. 35 -1- LSB 1133XS (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 11 (7) Region 7 consists of Adams, Appanoose, Clarke, Davis, 1 Decatur, Jefferson, Keokuk, Lucas, Monroe, Montgomery, Page, 2 Ringgold, Taylor, Union, Van Buren, Wapello, Washington, and 3 Wayne counties. 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 307A.9 Residency requirement ââ 5 resignation from office. 6 A member of the commission appointed to represent a region 7 of the state, as described in section 307A.1A, subsection 1, 8 who no longer resides in the region shall be deemed to have 9 resigned from the commission and the vacancy shall be filled 10 as described in section 307A.4. 11 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 12 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY AND TRANSITION. This Act applies 14 to members of the state transportation commission appointed 15 and confirmed on or after the effective date of this Act. The 16 first regular term appointment made on or after the effective 17 date of this Act shall represent region 1. The second regular 18 term appointment made on or after the effective date of 19 this Act shall represent region 2. The third regular term 20 appointment made on or after the effective date of this Act 21 shall represent region 3. The fourth regular term appointment 22 made on or after the effective date of this Act shall represent 23 region 4. The fifth regular term appointment made on or after 24 the effective date of this Act shall represent region 5. The 25 sixth regular term appointment made on or after the effective 26 date of this Act shall represent region 6. The seventh regular 27 term appointment made on or after the effective date of this 28 Act shall represent region 7. 29